Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 349 Coalbed Methane Development

349.005.
Legislative findings, purpose, and public policy.

The General Assembly hereby declares:

The venting of coalbed methane and degasification of coal seams is approved by the Commonwealth for the purpose of ensuring the safe recovery of coal;

The positive economic impact of coal mining to the Commonwealth is currently greater than that of coalbed methane production;

Coalbed methane is not found in conventional gas reservoirs;

Any development of coalbed methane should be undertaken in a way to protect and preserve the environment and protect and preserve the coal for future safe mining and the maximum recovery of coal;

Commercial recovery and marketing of coalbed methane should be facilitated whenever appropriate to meet the energy needs of both the Commonwealth and the United States;

The extraction of methane from mineable coal enhances mine safety, promotes environmental goals and objectives, and conserves an important energy resource; and

The Energy Policy Act of 1992 was enacted, in part, to encourage coalbed methane development and the Commonwealth should enact legislation to carry out the purpose of that act.

Therefore, in order to encourage and ensure the fullest practical safe recovery of both coal and coalbed methane, consistent with the above declarations and findings, this chapter is established to:

Authorize coalbed methane well permits;

Regulate the design of coalbed methane wells and recovery techniques;

Authorize coalbed methane well drilling units and pooling interests therein;

Establish field rules; and

Provide a process to enable coalbed methane well operators and coalbed methane owners to proceed with the orderly development and production of coalbed methane pending the judicial resolution of issues relating to coalbed methane ownership.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the General Assembly expressly finds that establishing an orderly process to permit and produce coalbed methane shall in no way be construed to create an inference or presumption as to the ownership of coalbed methane in any judicial or administrative proceeding, or be construed to or be used or interpreted to apply to any well otherwise permitted, approved, or regulated under KRS Chapter 353, except for any wells that are to be permitted, converted to, or operated as coalbed methane wells.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of this Commonwealth and in the public interest to:

Safeguard, preserve, and protect coal seams for safe mining; facilitate the expeditious, safe evacuation of coalbed methane from the coalbeds of this state; and maintain the ability and right of coal operators at all times to vent coalbed methane from mine areas for the safe recovery of coal;

Foster, encourage, and promote the commercial development of the Commonwealth’s coalbed methane by establishing procedures for issuing permits and forming drilling units for coalbed methane wells without adversely affecting the safety of mining or the mineability of coal seams;

Safeguard, protect, and enforce the correlative rights of coalbed methane operators and coalbed methane owners in a pool of coalbed methane so that each operator and owner may obtain his or her just and equitable share of production from coalbed methane;

Create a state permitting procedure and authority to provide for and facilitate coalbed methane development as encouraged by the Energy Policy Act of 1992; and

Seek the deletion of the Commonwealth of Kentucky from the list of affected states by the Secretary of the United States Department of Interior as provided for in the Energy Policy Act of 1992.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Natural Resources & Environmental Law.

Clevinger, The Battle Between Coal Rights and Gas Rights Continues: Hazard Coal Corp. v. Kentucky West Virginia Gas Co., 20 J. Nat. Resources & Envtl. L. 131 (2005-2006).

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Thomas, Coalbed Methane: Who Owns This $4.8 Billion Natural Resource in Kentucky. Vol. 72, No. 2, March 2008, Ky. Bench & Bar 6..

The Balancing of Coal and Coalbed Methane Interests Within the Coalbed Methane Statutory Schemes of Virginia, West Virginia and Kentucky, 19 J.N.R. & E.L. 137 (2004-2005).

349.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Abandoned” when used in connection with a well or hole means a well or hole which has never been used, or which, in the opinion of the department, will no longer be used for the production of coalbed methane or the injection or disposal of fluid therein;

“Coal interest holder” means every record coal owner, record coal lessee, mine licensee as defined in KRS 352.010(1)(r) and mine permittee as defined in KRS 350.010(21) whose coalbed is penetrated, or proposed to be penetrated, by a coalbed methane well;

“Coalbed” or “coal seam” means a seam of coal, whether workable or unworkable;

“Coalbed methane” means gas produced from a reservoir found in a coalbed, a mined-out area, or gob;

“Coalbed methane well” means any well drilled, deepened, converted, or reopened for the purpose of capturing coalbed methane for sale or use. Any well initially used for a coal mining-related purpose, such as a vent well, but which is subsequently used for the purpose of recovering coalbed methane for sale or use, shall then be deemed to be a coalbed methane well and shall comply with the provisions of this chapter at the time that the well is converted or used for the purpose of recovering coalbed methane for sale or use;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Correlative rights” means the reasonable opportunity of each person entitled to recover, without waste, the coalbed methane in and under his or her tract or tracts, or the equivalent thereof;

“Department” means the Department for Natural Resources;

“Director” means the director of the Division of Oil and Gas as established in KRS

353.530

;

“Drilling unit” means the maximum area in a pool which may be drained efficiently by one (1) well so as to produce the reasonable maximum recoverable coalbed methane in the area. Where the department has provided rules for the establishment of a drilling unit and an operator, proceeding within the framework of the rules so prescribed, has taken the action necessary to have a specified area established for production from a well, the area shall be a drilling unit;

“Division” means the Division of Mine Permits in the Department for Natural Resources;

“Field rules” means rules established by orders of the review board relating to the drilling, completion, production of, and specifications for coalbed methane wells in a particular geographic area as defined by an order;

“Gob” means the de-stressed zone associated with any full-seam extraction of coal that extends above and below the mined-out coalbed;

“Gob well” means a well drilled or a vent hole converted to a well pursuant to this chapter which produces or is capable of producing coalbed methane for sale or use, from a de-stressed zone associated with any full seam extraction of coal that extends above or below a mined-out coalbed;

“Horizontally drill” or “horizontal drilling” means the intentional act of drilling a borehole, shaft, or hole, which deviates from vertical for the purpose of penetrating a coal seam to produce coalbed methane;

“Mine licensee” means the mine licensee as defined in KRS 352.010(1)(r);

“Mine permittee” means the permittee as defined in KRS 350.010(21);

“Nonparticipating working interest owner” means a coalbed methane owner or lessee of a tract included in a drilling unit who elects to share in the operation of the coalbed methane well on a carried basis by agreeing to have his or her proportionate share of the costs allocable to his or her interest charged against his or her share of production from the coalbed methane well;

“Nonparticipating operator” means a nonparticipating working interest owner who is also the operator of the coalbed methane well;

“Operator” means any owner of the right to drill, develop, operate, and produce coalbed methane from a pool and to appropriate the coalbed methane produced therefrom, either for himself or herself, or for himself, herself, and others; in the event there is no coalbed methane lease in existence with respect to the tract in question, the owner of the coalbed methane rights therein shall be considered as an “operator” to the extent of seven-eighths (7/8) of the coalbed methane in that portion of the pool underlying the tract owned by that owner, and as a “royalty owner” as to one-eighth (1/8) interest in that coalbed methane;

“Other interested coalbed methane parties” means all working interest owners other than the operator, all royalty and overriding royalty interest owners or holders, and any other party who owns or holds a right or interest in a drilling unit, coalbed methane well site for which a drilling permit has been issued or is pending, and all associated equipment, facilities, infrastructure, and improvements;

“Participating working interest owner” means a coalbed methane owner or lessee who elects to bear a share of the risks and costs of drilling, completing, equipping, operating, plugging, and abandoning a coalbed methane well equal to the proportion which the acreage in the drilling unit he or she owns or holds under lease bears to the total acreage of the drilling unit;

“Participating operator” means a participating working interest owner who is also the operator of the coalbed methane well;

“Person” means any person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, receiver, governmental agency subject to this chapter, trustee, so-called common law or statutory trust, guardian, executor, administrator, or fiduciary of any kind, federal agency, state agency, city, commission, political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any interstate body;

“Plat” means a map, drawing, or print showing the location of a well;

“Review board” means the Coalbed Methane Well Review Board;

“Royalty owner” means any owner of coalbed methane in place, or coalbed methane rights, to the extent that the owner is not an operator as defined in subsection (20) of this section;

“Stimulate” means any action taken to increase the flow of coalbed methane, or the inherent productivity of a coalbed methane well, including but not limited to fracturing, shooting, acidizing, or waterflooding, but excluding cleaning out, bailing, or workover operations;

“Surface owner” means the person in whose name the surface of the land is assessed for purposes of taxes imposed according to the property valuation administrator;

“Unit” means any tract or tracts which the department has determined are underlaid by a pool or pools of coalbed methane and are not drilling units as defined in subsection (10) of this section;

“Unitization” means the act of combining separately owned tracts or separate interests therein into a unit constituting all or some portion of a coalbed that produces or is capable of producing coalbed methane and the joint operation of that unit;

“Unit operator” means the party designated in a pooling order to develop a unit by the drilling of one (1) or more coalbed methane wells;

“Vent hole” means a borehole, shaft driven, or hole dug, drilled, deepened, converted or reopened, which is used for the purpose of releasing or venting coalbed methane to the atmosphere and not for the purpose of capturing or producing coalbed methane for sale or use;

“Venting” means the act of releasing coalbed methane to the atmosphere;

“Well” means any borehole, shaft driven, or hole dug, drilled, deepened, converted or reopened for the purpose of capturing or producing coalbed methane for sale or use; and

“Workable coalbed” means:

Any coalbed twenty-four (24) inches or more in thickness;

Any coalbed actually being operated commercially;

Any coalbed that the department decides can be operated commercially, and the operation of which can reasonably be expected to commence within not more than ten (10) years; or

Any coalbed that, from outcrop indication or other definite evidence, proves to the satisfaction of the department to be workable and, when operated, will require protection if wells are drilled through or into it.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 44, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 241, § 7, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 1871, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 117, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

349.015.
Application for permits — Contents, distribution, and filing of plats — Notice to record owners, licensees, and permittees — Information required to accompany plats or exhibits.

Before a permit may be issued by the department to drill a coalbed methane well on any tract known to be underlaid with coal-bearing strata, the well operator shall provide to the department a plat prepared by a licensed, professional land surveyor and a licensed, professional engineer showing:

The county in which the coalbed methane well drill site is located;

The name of the surface owner of the drill site tract, the acreage of the drill site tract, the names of the surface owners of adjacent tracts, the names of all coal interest holders from the surface to fifty (50) feet below the deepest penetration of the coalbed methane well on the tract on which the well is proposed to be located, and the names of all oil and gas owners from the surface to one hundred (100) feet below the deepest penetration of the coalbed methane well on the tract on which the well is proposed to be located;

The proposed or actual location of the coalbed methane well determined by bearing and distance, relative to two (2) permanent points or monuments that appear on the applicable United States Geological Survey seven and one-half (7-1/2) minute topographic quadrangle map;

The location of any other existing or permitted coalbed methane well or any oil or gas well located within one thousand five hundred (1,500) feet of the well;

The outside boundary of the mineral tract from which the coalbed methane is to be produced if within seven hundred fifty (750) feet of the well; and

The number to be given the coalbed methane well, the earliest date for commencement of drilling, the earliest date for commencement of any stimulation of the coalbed methane well, and if horizontal drilling of a coalbed methane well is proposed, the vertical and horizontal alignment and extent of the coalbed methane well.

If the location of any coalbed methane well proposed to be drilled, deepened, or reopened is known to be underlaid by a coal bearing stratum which is not within the area of an existing mining permit or the proposed permitted area of a pending application or permit modification for a mine before the division, simultaneously with the filing of an application for a permit, the applicant shall send, by registered or certified mail, a copy of the required plat to the record coal owner or owners and record coal lessee or lessees from the surface to fifty (50) feet below the deepest penetration of the coalbed methane well on the tract on which the well is proposed to be located.

If the coal bearing stratum is within the area of an existing mining permit or the proposed permitted area of a pending application or permit modification for a mine before the division, a copy of the required plat shall also be sent by the applicant, by registered or certified mail, to each mine licensee and mine permittee operating any stratum as designated on the current license issued by the department and at the address stated thereon.

A copy of the required plat shall also be sent, by registered or certified mail, simultaneously with the filing of an application for a permit, to the surface owner of the drill site tract and surface owners of adjoining tracts.

If the address of any record owner is unknown to the applicant and cannot upon diligent inquiry within the county be ascertained, or if there are more than five (5) record owners, then the applicant shall file with the department an affidavit that either condition exists, and the department may prescribe some different method of notifying the record owner in lieu of sending a copy of the plat and notice of application as required by this section.

The plat shall be filed and become a permanent record, subject to inspection at any time by any interested person. Any executive officer, process agent, or chief engineer of the mine licensee or mine permittee may be considered a mine licensee or mine permittee for the purposes of mailing the required copy of the plat.

If a coalbed methane well is proposed to be drilled, deepened, converted, or reopened by an applicant who is not the owner or lessee of all of the oil and gas interests, the applicant shall, simultaneously with the filing of the application for a permit, send by registered or certified mail a copy of the required plat to the record oil and gas lessees of, to the record oil and gas lessors of, and to the operator of all oil and gas wells producing from, all formations from the surface to one hundred (100) feet below the deepest penetration of the coalbed methane well on the tract upon which the well is proposed to be located.

The operator shall promptly upon completion of either a vertically drilled coalbed methane well located ten (10) feet or more from the location reflected on the plat required with the permit application or a horizontally drilled coalbed methane well file with the department an as-drilled plat prepared by a licensed professional land surveyor and a licensed professional engineer reflecting the actual coalbed methane well location. If the operator has completed a horizontally drilled coalbed methane well, the as-drilled plat shall show its alignment and extent. The plat shall become a permanent record subject to inspection at any time by any interested persons.

Each plat, or exhibit attached thereto, shall have the following information on a form supplied by the department:

Notice of the application for a coalbed methane well and the address where a copy of the application may be obtained;

A statement that the recipient has twenty (20) days within which to file an objection to the proposed coalbed methane well, its location, the proposed stimulation in the workable coalbed, or the proposed completion in the workable coalbed; and

A statement that the applicant has met and conferred with, or offered to meet and confer with, each coal interest holder concerning the proposed coalbed methane well, its location, the proposed stimulation in the workable coalbed, or the proposed completion in the workable coalbed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 45, effective June 20, 2005.

349.020.
Filing of objections to drilling — Filing of real property interest claims — Issuance of drilling permit — Department to notify Division of Mine Permits of applications to drill — Appeal to review board.

If the drilling of a coalbed methane well could adversely affect the present or future use or operation of a workable coalbed, any coal interest holder may object to a proposed coalbed methane well, the well’s location, the proposed stimulation in the workable coalbed, or the proposed completion in the workable coalbed. Any coal interest holder, within twenty (20) days of receipt of the plat by him or her and by the department, may file specific objections in writing with the department. The filed objections shall provide sufficient detail for the applicant to identify the nature and substance of the objection. The department shall notify the applicant of the objections and fix a time and place for a hearing before the review board to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and this chapter.

If any coal interest holder, notified pursuant to KRS

349.015

, or any other person, claims to have a valid real property interest in, or the current legal right to produce, coalbed methane, the person claiming the real property interest or right shall notify the applicant and the department, in writing, within twenty (20) days from the receipt of the plat by him or her and by the department. The person also shall request that a pooling order be entered pursuant to KRS 349.080(1).

If the record oil and gas lessor, lessee, or well operator notified pursuant to KRS

349.015

, or any other person, claims to have a valid real property interest in, or the current legal right to produce, coalbed methane, the person claiming the real property interest or right shall notify the applicant and the department, in writing, within twenty (20) days from the receipt of the plat by him. The person shall request that a pooling order be entered pursuant to KRS 349.080(1).

If no objections are filed within the twenty (20) day period, the department shall immediately issue a drilling permit to the well operator approving the location of the well and authorizing the well operator to proceed to drill at that location, provided all other preconditions to issuance of a permit, as contained in this chapter, have been met.

Upon receipt of an application to drill a coalbed methane well, the department shall provide a copy of the required plat and permit application to the division. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt by the division, notification shall be sent to the department by the division as to whether the proposed coalbed methane well will be located within the boundaries of any coal mine for which a permit has been issued or has been applied for pursuant to KRS Chapter 350. If the proposed coalbed methane well is to penetrate a workable coalbed that is within the area of an existing permit for an underground mine issued by the division, or the proposed permitted area of a pending application or permit modification for an underground mine before the division, the written authorization of the mine permittee shall be required prior to issuance by the department of a permit to stimulate, complete, or horizontally drill the coalbed methane well in the workable coalbed that is within the area of an existing permit for an underground mine issued by the division or within the proposed permitted area of a pending application or permit modification for an underground mine before the division. If the proposed coalbed methane well is to be located within a surface area permitted, or proposed in a pending application or permit modification to be issued by the division, the written authorization of the mine permittee shall be required prior to issuance by the department of a permit to drill the coalbed methane well. In the absence of the written authorization of the mine permittee, the applicant may file an appeal with the review board requesting approval to drill the proposed coalbed methane well if:

Authorization has been denied by the mine permittee; and

The proposed location and area to be disturbed by the proposed coalbed methane well has achieved either a partial bond release status or the bond for the area has been forfeited.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 46, effective June 20, 2005.

349.025.
Procedure for plugging and abandoning wells — Request for hearing — Exception — Rights of coal interest holder.

Prior to the abandonment of a coalbed methane well drilled through a workable coalbed, the well operator shall notify, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by registered mail, all the coal interest holders of the workable coalbed and the department of the operator’s intention to plug and abandon the well. The notice shall give the number of the well and its location, and fix the time at which the work of plugging and filling will be commenced. The time shall not be less than fifteen (15) days after the day on which the notice was received, or in due course should be received, by the department. The department shall prescribe the form of notice to be used. A representative of any coal interest holder, at his or her own expense and liability, and of the department may be present at the plugging and filling of the well. Regardless of whether representatives appear, the well operator may proceed, at the time fixed, to plug and fill the well. When the well is plugged and filled, an affidavit setting forth the time and manner in which the well was plugged shall be made in triplicate by two (2) persons experienced in plugging and filling wells who participated in the work. The affidavit shall be made on forms furnished by the department. One (1) copy of the affidavit shall be retained by the well operator, one (1) provided to each coal interest holder, and one (1) provided to the department.

In addition to the notification required under subsection (1) of this section, prior to the abandonment of a coalbed methane well the operator shall submit a plugging plan which is subject to approval by the department. The proposed plugging plan shall be designed to allow coal mining to occur through the well after the well is plugged.

If a coalbed methane well ceases to produce in paying quantities and no dewatering operations are being conducted for a period of fifteen (15) consecutive months, any coal interest holder or any record oil or gas lessor or lessee of any tract being penetrated by the coalbed methane well, may file a request for hearing pursuant to KRS

349.060

, to determine whether the well has been abandoned and should be plugged in accordance with this section. However, nothing in this subsection shall require the plugging and abandonment of a coalbed methane well that is being temporarily shut in by the coalbed methane well operator. Simultaneously with the filing of a request for a hearing with the department, the person requesting the hearing shall send a copy of the request to the coalbed methane well operator.

Any coal interest holder shall have the following rights with respect to a coalbed methane well to be plugged and abandoned:

To convert the coalbed methane well to a vent hole or otherwise take the coalbed methane well. In this event the department, upon determination that the coal interest holder has placed the coalbed methane well under a mining permit, shall release the coalbed methane well operator’s bond and the coalbed methane well operator shall be relieved of further responsibility for the coalbed methane well; and

To file an objection concerning the proposed manner or method of plugging with the department, within fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice of intent to plug. The department shall consider any objection and may issue an order specifying the manner and method of plugging and reclamation consistent with this section.

All coalbed methane wells shall be plugged and abandoned in accordance with this section. The department shall promulgate regulations specifying the manner and method of plugging vertical and horizontal coalbed methane wells and in so doing, or in entering any order for such plugging and abandonment, shall give consideration to the ability to mine any affected coal seam safely and the protection of any affected coal seam for future mining.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 65, § 5, effective July 13, 2004.